Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3626
Annexation of sewerage disposal system and plant by city or village; powers and duties of city or village.

Whenever any city or village annexes all of the land encompassing a sewerage disposal system and plant or plants constructed, improved, or extended by a county pursuant to the County Industrial Sewer Construction Act, the annexing city or village shall succeed to all the property and property rights of every kind, contracts, obligations, and choses in action of every kind, held by or belonging to the county with regard to the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants, and the city or village shall be liable for and recognize, assume, and carry out all valid contracts and obligations of the county with regard to the sewerage system and plant or plants. All taxes, assessments, claims, and demands of every kind due or owing to the county with regard to the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants shall be paid to and collected by the city or village. Any special assessments which the county was authorized to levy, assess, relevy, or reassess, but which were not levied, assessed, relevied, or reassessed at the time of the annexation for improvements made by the county pursuant to such act, may be levied, assessed, relevied, or reassessed by the annexing city or village to the same extent as the county may have levied or assessed prior to the annexation.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 26.